Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 2. Interstate Compact on Conservation

Law reviews. —

For discussion of this article, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 5 (1958).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Gas and Oil §§ 259 to 308.

§ 30-5-201.
Governor authorized to join in interstate compact.

The governor of the state of Wyoming is hereby authorized for and in the name of the state of Wyoming to join with the other states in the interstate compact to conserve oil and gas, which was executed in the city of Dallas, Texas, on the 16th day of February, 1935, and has been extended to the 1st day of September, 1955, with the consent of congress, and that said compact and all extensions are now on deposit with the department of state of the United States.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 116, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-235.

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 73.

§ 30-5-202.
Authority of governor to execute agreements; provision for withdrawal from compact.

The governor of the state of Wyoming is further authorized and empowered, for and in the name of the state of Wyoming to execute agreements for the further extension of the expiration date of said interstate compact to conserve oil and gas, and to determine if and when it shall be to the best interest of the state of Wyoming to withdraw from said compact upon sixty (60) days notice as provided by its terms. In the event that he shall determine that the state shall withdraw from said compact, he shall have the power and authority to give necessary notice and to take any and all steps necessary and proper to effect the withdrawal of the state of Wyoming from said compact.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 30-236.

§ 30-5-203.
Governor designated official representative; authority to appoint assistant; authority and oath of assistant; removal.

The governor shall be the official representative of the state of Wyoming in the compact to conserve oil and gas, and shall exercise and perform for the state all of the powers and duties as such, provided he may appoint an assistant representative who shall act in his stead as the official representative of the state of Wyoming. His official representative, if not already a state official, shall take the oath of office prescribed by the constitution and file the same with the secretary of state. The governor may remove the assistant representative as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 116, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 30-237; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

§ 30-5-204.
Construction of W.S. 30-5-201 through 30-5-204.

It is not the intent or purpose of this act [§§

30-5-201

through

30-5-204

] to require, permit, or authorize the governor, commission or supervisor to prorate or distribute the production of oil and gas among the fields of Wyoming on the basis of market demand. This act shall never be construed to require, permit or authorize the governor, commission, the supervisor or any court to make, enter or enforce any order, rule, regulation or judgment requiring restriction of any production of any pool or of any well except to prevent waste and to protect correlative rights.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 116, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 30-238; Laws 1969, ch. 139, § 3; 1971, ch. 11, § 5.